Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB834.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 701. Access.* * *(c) Online availability of certain financial records.--(1) By the last day of each month, an agency shall make available on its publicly accessible Internet website a financial record dealing with the disbursement of funds by 123456789101112131415161718192021 the agency during the prior month.(2) By the last day of each fiscal quarter, an agency shall submit to the Department of the Auditor General an affirmation stating that all financial records dealing with the disbursement of funds by the agency during the prior fiscal quarter have been made available in accordance with paragraph (1).(3) The Department of the Auditor General shall conduct periodic audits, as deemed necessary by the Auditor General, to ensure accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection.(4) A person may bring a civil cause of action based upon a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) in an appropriate court for declaratory, injunctive or mandamus relief with respect to the violation. The court may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees, including litigation expenses, for each individual violation of paragraph (1) or (2).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0834PN0864 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819